District of Columbia statutes.
47-1042

National Guard Association; lot 60, square 625.

The property situated in square 625 in the City of Washington, District of Columbia, described as lot 60, together with the improvements thereon, shall be exempt from all taxation so long as the property is owned by and titled in the name of the National Guard Association of the United States, a District of Columbia nonprofit corporation, is occupied by the Association, is used solely for purposes of the Association, and is not used for commercial purposes, subject to the provisions of §§ 47-1005, 47-1007, and 47-1009. The transfer of the property to the National Guard Association of the United States shall be exempt from all transfer and recordation taxes of the District of Columbia.

Sept. 8, 1960, 74 Stat. 856, Pub. L. 86-727
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-276, § 2, 52 DCR 831
1981 Ed., § 47-1042.
1973 Ed., § 47-835.
D.C. Law 15-276 rewrote the section which had read:
“The property situated in square 625 in the City of Washington, District of Columbia, described as lot 60, together with the improvements thereon, owned by the President, Vice-President, Secretary, and Treasurer of the National Guard Association of the United States, as trustees and in trust for the use and benefit of the National Guard Association of the United States, a voluntary unincorporated association with principal headquarters in the District of Columbia, is hereby exempt from all taxation from and after July 1, 1961, so long as the same is owned by the President, Vice-President, Secretary, and Treasurer of the National Guard Association of the United States, as trustees and in trust for the use and benefit of the National Guard Association of the United States and occupied by the National Guard Association of the United States, is used solely for the purposes of said Association, and is not used for commercial purposes, subject to the provisions of §§ 47-1005, 47-1007, and 47-1009.”
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of National Guard Association of the United States Real Property Tax Exemption Reconfirmation and Modification Temporary Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 15-40, November 26, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 10698).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of National Guard Association of the United States Real Property Tax Exemption Reconfirmation and Modification Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-115, July 29, 2003, 50 DCR 6592).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of National Guard Association of the United States Real Property Tax Exemption Reconfirmation and Modification Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-217, November 7, 2003, 50 DCR 10039).